Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-418
State College Facilities Program; contracts authorized; limitations.

(1) In order to accomplish any projects authorized by section 85-417, the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges may enter into contracts with any person, firm, or corporation providing for the implementation of any such project of the Nebraska state colleges and providing for the long-term payment of the cost of such project from the State College Facilities Program. In no case shall any such contract extend for a period beyond July 15, 2011, nor shall any such contract exceed the repayment capabilities implicit in the funding streams authorized in sections 85-412 and 85-417.

(2) The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall not pledge the credit of the State of Nebraska for the payment of any sum owing on account of such contract, except that there may be pledged for the payment of any such contract any appropriation specifically made by the Legislature for such purpose, together with such funds of the Board of Trustees as the board determines. No contract shall be entered into pursuant to this section without prior approval by resolution by the Board of Trustees. The Board of Trustees may also convey, lease, or lease back all or any part of the projects authorized by section 85-417 and the land on which such projects are situated to such person, firm, or corporation as the Board of Trustees may contract with pursuant to this section to facilitate the long-term payment of the cost of such projects. Any such conveyance or lease shall provide that when the cost of such projects has been paid, together with interest and other costs thereon, such projects and the land on which such projects are located shall become the property of the Board of Trustees.

(3) The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges is authorized to make expenditures for the purposes stated in this section and section 85-417 from interest income balances in any fund created under the authority provided for in any contract or contracts authorized by this section. Any appropriated amounts and amounts designated or matched by the Board of Trustees under section 85-412 in excess of amounts required to meet debt service and any interest earnings derived from reserve funds or any other funds created under the authority provided for in any contract or contracts authorized by this section shall be accumulated and applied toward early retirement of debt as authorized under any indenture or other contract entered into by the Board of Trustees as authorized by this section. The Board of Trustees and the Department of Administrative Services shall, on or before January 1, 1999, enter into an agreement providing for the allocation and distribution of any balances existing in the State College Facilities Program or any other funds created as part of a long-term contract entered into by the Board of Trustees pursuant to this section to the General Fund and any other funds designated by the Board of Trustees as a source of funds for the match specified in section 85-412 either on July 15, 2011, or when all financial obligations incurred in the contracts entered into by the Board of Trustees pursuant to this section are discharged, whichever occurs first.

Laws 1998, LB 1100, § 7.